California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) The board shall hear and decide a matter, including, but not limited to, a contested case or a petition for reinstatement or modification of probation, or may assign the matter to an administrative law judge in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2538.19 by Stats. 2017, Ch. 454, Sec. 8.   (AB 1706)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2533.6.

(a) A person whose license has been revoked or suspended, or who has been placed on probation, may petition the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including modification or termination of probation, after a period of not less than the following minimum period of time has elapsed from the effective date of the decision ordering that disciplinary action:

(1) At least three years for reinstatement of a license revoked for unprofessional conduct, except that the board may, for good cause shown, specify in a revocation order that a petition for reinstatement may be filed after two years.

(2) At least two years for early
 termination or one year for modification of a condition of probation of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for reinstatement of a license revoked for mental or physical illness, or for modification of a condition, or termination of probation of less than three years.

(b) The petition shall be on a form provided by the board and shall state any facts and information as may be required by the board, including, but not limited to, proof of compliance with the terms and conditions of the underlying disciplinary order. The petition shall be verified by the petitioner who shall file an original and sufficient copies of the petition, together with any supporting documents, for the members of the board, the administrative law judge, and the Attorney General.

(c) The petition may be heard by the board, with the matter
 presided over by an administrative law judge. After a hearing on the petition, the administrative law judge shall provide a decision as determined by the board which shall be acted upon in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(d) The board or the administrative law judge hearing the petition may consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken, the offense for which the petitioner was disciplined, the petitioner’s activities during the time the license was in good standing, and the petitioner’s rehabilitative efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability. The hearing may be continued, as the board or the administrative law judge finds necessary.

(e) The administrative law judge when hearing a petition for reinstating a license, or modifying a penalty, may recommend the imposition of any terms and conditions deemed
 necessary.

(f) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the petitioner. The board may deny, without a hearing or argument, any petition filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of the prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(g) The board may deny, without a hearing or argument, any petition for termination or modification of probation filed pursuant to this section for any of the following:

(1) The petitioner has failed to comply with the terms and conditions of the disciplinary order.

(2) The board is conducting an investigation of the petitioner while they are on probation.

(3) The petitioner has a subsequent arrest that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensee or registrant and this arrest occurred while on probation.

(4) The petitioner’s probation with the board is currently tolled.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to alter Sections 822 and 823.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 3.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Revenue [2534. - 2534.2.]

2534.

There is in the State Treasury the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Fund. The board shall report to the Controller at the beginning of each month for the month preceding the amount and source of all revenue received by it pursuant to this chapter and shall pay the entire amount thereof to the Treasurer for deposit in the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Fund. All money in the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 454, Sec. 7.   (AB 1706)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2534.1.

The board shall keep records that will reasonably ensure that funds expended in the administration of each licensing or registration category shall bear a reasonable relation to the revenue derived from each category.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2534.2.

The amount of the fees prescribed by this chapter is that established by the following schedule:

(a) (1) The application fee and renewal fee for speech-language pathologists and nondispensing audiologists shall be established by the board in an amount that does not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) but is sufficient to support the functions of the board that relate to the functions authorized by this chapter, excluding Article 9 (commencing with Section 2539.1).

(2) The application fee and renewal fee for dispensing audiologists shall be established by the board in an amount that does not exceed two hundred eighty
 dollars ($280) but is sufficient to support the functions of the board that relate to the functions authorized by this chapter.

(b) The delinquency fee shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(c) The reexamination fee shall be established by the board in an amount that does not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).

(d) The registration fee and renewal fee of an aide shall be established by the board in an amount that does not exceed thirty dollars ($30).

(e) A fee to be set by the board of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) shall be charged for each application for approval as a speech-language pathology assistant.

(f) A fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) shall be charged for the issuance of and for the renewal of each approval as a speech-language pathology assistant, unless a lower fee is established by the board.

(g) The duplicate wall certificate fee is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(h) The duplicate renewal receipt fee is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(i) The application fee and renewal fee for a temporary license is thirty dollars ($30).

(j) The fee for issuance of a license status and history certification letter shall be established by the board in an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 415, Sec. 17.   (AB 2686)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Licensing and Registration [2535. - 2535.4.]

2535.

(a) All licenses issued as of January 1, 1992, shall expire at 12 a.m. of the last date of the birth month of the licensee during the second year of a two-year term if not renewed.

(b) All licenses issued under this chapter, except those licenses issued pursuant to subdivision (a), shall expire at 12 a.m. of the last date of the birth month of the licensee during the second year of a two-year term, if not renewed.

(c) To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, on or before the date of expiration of the license, apply for renewal on a form provided by the board, accompanied by the prescribed renewal fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2535.2.

Except as provided in Section 2535.3, a license that has expired may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration upon filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the license is not renewed on or before its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the prescribed delinquency fee. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which all renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the expiration date provided in Section 2535, after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire and become invalid if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 435, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2535.4.

A person who fails to renew their license within the five years after its expiration may not renew it, and it may not be restored, reissued, or reinstated thereafter, but that person may apply for and obtain a new license if they meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Have not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(b) Take and pass the examination or examinations, if any, that would be required of them if an initial application for licensure was being made, or otherwise establishes to the satisfaction of the board that, with due regard for the public interest, they are qualified to practice as
 a speech-language pathologist or audiologist, as the case may be.

(c) Pays all of the fees that would be required if an initial application for licensure was being made. In addition, the board may charge the applicant a fee to cover the actual costs of any examination that it may administer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 6.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Speech-Language Pathology Corporations and Audiology Corporations [2536. - 2537.5.]

2536.

A speech-language pathology corporation or an audiology corporation is a corporation which is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services who are speech-language pathologists or audiologists are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, this article, and all other statutes and regulations now or hereafter enacted or adopted pertaining to the corporation and the conduct of its affairs.

With respect to a speech-language pathology corporation or an audiology corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox
 Professional Corporation Act is the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 15.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2537.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter for any person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate, any provision or term of this article, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, or any regulations duly adopted under those laws.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2537.1.

A speech-language pathology corporation or an audiology corporation shall not do or fail to do any act that the doing or failing to do would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute or regulation now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by those statutes and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a license under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 39.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2537.2.

Except as provided in Sections 13401.5 and 13403 of the Corporations Code, each shareholder, director and officer of a speech-language pathology corporation or an audiology corporation, except an assistant secretary and an assistant treasurer, shall be a licensed person as defined in Section 13401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 40.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2537.3.

The income of a speech-language pathology corporation or an audiology corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of that shareholder or their share in the speech-language pathology or audiology corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 7.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2537.4.

(a) The name of a speech-language pathology corporation under which it may render professional services shall include one of the words specified in subdivision (a) of Section 2530.3 and the word “corporation” or wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence.

(b) The name of an audiology corporation under which it may render professional services shall include one of the words specified in subdivision (b) of Section 2530.3 and the word “corporation” or wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2538 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1058, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2537.5.

The board may adopt and enforce regulations to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article, and the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, including regulations requiring any of the following:

(a) That the bylaws of a speech-language pathology corporation or an audiology corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of the corporation owned by a disqualified person as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, or by the estate of a deceased person shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of the corporation within that time as the regulations may provide.

(b) That a speech-language pathology corporation or an audiology corporation shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its patients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2539 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1058, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Speech-Language Pathology Assistant [2538. - 2538.7.]

2538.

A person seeking approval as a speech-language pathology assistant shall make application to the board for that approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1058, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.1.

(a) The board shall adopt regulations, in collaboration with the State Department of Education, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, and the Advisory Commission on Special Education, that set forth standards and requirements for the adequate supervision of speech-language pathology assistants.

(b) The board shall adopt regulations as reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this article, that shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) Procedures and requirements for application, registration, renewal, suspension, and revocation.

(2) Standards for approval of Associate Degree Speech-Language Pathology Assistant training programs based upon standards and curriculum guidelines established by the National Council on Academic Accreditation in Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology, or the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association, or equivalent formal training programs consisting of two years of technical education, including supervised field placements. The board may impanel site review committees to conduct onsite evaluations, inspections, and investigations of a speech-language pathology assistant training program and to assess the training program’s compliance with the board’s laws and regulations. The members of the site review committee shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for their actual travel and per diem expenses by the institution that is the subject of the evaluation, inspection, or investigation.

(3) Standards for accreditation of a Speech-Language Pathology Assistant training program’s institution by the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges or the Senior College Commission of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, or equivalent accreditation.

(4) The scope of responsibility, duties, and functions of speech-language pathology assistants, that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Conducting speech-language screening, without interpretation, and using screening protocols developed by the supervising speech-language pathologist.

(B) Providing direct treatment assistance to patients or clients under the supervision of a speech-language pathologist.

(C) Following and implementing documented treatment plans or protocols developed by a supervising speech-language pathologist.

(D) Documenting patient or client progress toward meeting established objectives, and reporting the information to a supervising speech-language pathologist.

(E) Assisting a speech-language pathologist during assessments, including, but not limited to, assisting with formal documentation, preparing materials, and performing clerical duties for a supervising speech-language pathologist.

(F) When competent to do so, as determined by the supervising speech-language pathologist, acting as an interpreter for non-English-speaking patients or clients and their family members.

(G) Scheduling activities and preparing charts, records, graphs, and data.

(H) Performing checks and maintenance of equipment, including, but not limited to, augmentative communication devices.

(I) Assisting with speech-language pathology research projects, in-service training, and family or community education.

The regulations shall provide that speech-language pathology assistants are not authorized to conduct evaluations, interpret data, alter treatment plans, or perform any task without the express knowledge and approval of a supervising speech-language pathologist.

(5) The requirements for the wearing of distinguishing name badges with the title of speech-language pathology assistant.

(6) Minimum continuing professional development requirements for the speech-language pathology assistant, not to exceed 12 hours in a two-year period. The speech-language pathology assistant’s supervisor shall act as a professional development advisor. The speech-language pathology assistant’s professional growth may be satisfied with successful completion of state or regional conferences, workshops, formal in-service presentations, independent study programs, or any combination of these concerning communication and related disorders.

(7) Minimum continuing professional development requirements for the supervisor of a speech-language pathology assistant.

(8) The type and amount of direct and indirect supervision required for speech-language pathology assistants.

(9) The maximum number of assistants permitted per supervisor.

(10) A requirement that the supervising speech-language pathologist shall remain responsible and accountable for clinical judgments and decisions and the maintenance of the highest quality and standards of practice when a speech-language pathology assistant is utilized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 485, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.3.

A person applying for approval as a speech-language pathology assistant shall have graduated from a speech-language pathology assistant associate degree program, or equivalent course of study, approved by the board. A person who has successfully graduated from a board-approved bachelor’s degree program in speech-language pathology or communication disorders shall be deemed to have satisfied an equivalent course of study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.5.

This article shall not be construed to limit the utilization of a speech aide or other personnel employed by a public school working under the direct supervision of a credentialed speech-language pathologist as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 3051.1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1058, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.7.

(a) No person who is not registered as a speech-language pathology assistant shall utilize the title speech-language pathology assistant or a similar title that includes the words speech or language when combined with the term assistant.

(b) No person who is not registered as a speech-language pathology assistant shall perform the duties or functions of a speech-language pathology assistant, except as provided by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1058, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Hearing Aid Dispensers [2538.10. - 2538.57.]

2538.10.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Advertise” and its variants include the use of a newspaper, magazine, or other publication, book, notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, handbill, poster, bill, sign, placard, card, label, tag, window display, store sign, radio, or television announcement, or any other means or methods now or hereafter employed to bring to the attention of the public the practice of fitting or selling of hearing aids.

(b) “License” means a hearing aid dispenser license issued pursuant to this article and includes a temporary or trainee license.

(c) “Licensee” means a person holding a license.

(d) “Hearing aid” means any wearable instrument or device designed for, or offered for the purpose of, aiding or compensating for impaired human hearing.

(e) “Fund” means the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 10.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.11.

(a) “Practice of fitting or selling hearing aids,” as used in this article, means those practices used for the purpose of selection and adaptation of hearing aids, including direct observation of the ear, testing of hearing in connection with the fitting and selling of hearing aids, taking of ear mold impressions, fitting or sale of hearing aids, and any necessary postfitting counseling.

The practice of fitting or selling hearing aids does not include the act of concluding the transaction by a retail clerk.

When any audiometer or other equipment is used in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids, it shall be kept properly calibrated and in good working condition, and the
 calibration of the audiometer or other equipment shall be checked at least annually.

(b) A hearing aid dispenser shall not conduct diagnostic hearing tests when conducting tests in connection with the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids.

(c) Hearing tests conducted pursuant to this article shall include those that are in compliance with the Food and Drug Administration Guidelines for Hearing Aid Devices and those that are specifically covered in the licensing examination prepared and administered by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.12.

A licensee may conduct hearing screenings at a health fair or similar event by the application of a binary puretone screening at a preset intensity level for the purpose of identifying the need for further hearing or medical evaluation.

Upon the conclusion of each hearing screening, the licensee shall present to the person whose hearing was screened a written statement containing the following provisions:

“Results of a hearing screening are not a medical evaluation of your ear nor a diagnosis of a hearing disorder but are only the identification of the need for further medical or hearing evaluation.”

A licensee conducting hearing screenings pursuant to this
 section shall not make or seek referrals for testing, fitting, or dispensing of hearing aids.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.13.

In fitting hearing aids, a hearing aid dispenser shall not take facial measurements or fit, adjust, or adapt lenses or spectacle frames, except that a hearing aid dispenser may replace the temple or temples of a person’s spectacle frames with a temple or temples incorporating hearing aid components.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.14.

“Hearing aid dispenser,” as used in this article, means a person engaged in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids to an individual with impaired hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.15.

“Sell” or “sale” means any transfer of title or of the right to use by lease, bailment, or any other contract, excluding wholesale transactions with distributors or dealers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.16.

The board shall keep a record of all prosecutions for violations of this article and of all examinations held for applicants for licenses together with the names and addresses of all persons taking examinations and of their success or failure to pass them.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.17.

The board may recommend the preparation of and administration of a course of instruction concerned with the fitting and selection of hearing aids. The board may require applicants to first complete the required course of instruction or otherwise satisfy the board that the applicant possesses the necessary background and qualifications to fit or sell hearing aids. If the board promulgates regulations to implement this section to require a course of instruction concerned with fitting and selling hearing aids, the board shall obtain the advice of persons knowledgeable in the preparation and administration of a course of instruction.

The board may publish and distribute information concerning the examination requirements for obtaining a license to
 engage in the practice of fitting and selling hearing aids within this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.18.

All holders of licenses to sell or fit hearing aids shall continue their education after receiving the license. The board shall provide by regulation, as a condition to the renewal of a license, that licensees shall submit documentation satisfactory to the board that they have informed themselves of current practices related to the fitting of hearing aids by having pursued courses of study satisfactory to the board or by other means defined as equivalent by the board.

Continuing education courses shall be subject to monitoring to ensure compliance with the regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.20.

It is unlawful for an individual to engage in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids, or to display a sign or in any other way to advertise or hold themselves out as being so engaged without having first obtained a license from the board under the provisions of this article. Nothing in this article shall prohibit a corporation, partnership, trust, association, or other like organization maintaining an established business address from engaging in the business of fitting or selling, or offering for sale, hearing aids at retail without a license, provided that any and all fitting or selling of hearing aids is conducted by the individuals who are licensed pursuant to the provisions of this article. A person whose license as a hearing aid dispenser has been suspended or revoked shall not be the proprietor of a business that engages in the
 practice of fitting or selling hearing aids nor shall that person be a partner, shareholder, member, or fiduciary in a partnership, corporation, association, or trust that maintains or operates that business, during the period of the suspension or revocation. This restriction shall not apply to stock ownership in a corporation that is listed on a stock exchange regulated by the Securities and Exchange Commission if the stock is acquired in a transaction conducted through that stock exchange.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 8.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.21.

This article does not apply to a person engaged in the practice of fitting hearing aids if their practice is for a governmental agency, or private clinic, or is part of the academic curriculum of an accredited institution of higher education, or part of a program conducted by a public, charitable institution or other nonprofit organization, and who does not engage directly or indirectly in the sale or offering for sale of hearing aids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 9.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.22.

This article does not apply to nor affect any physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 who does not directly or indirectly engage in the sale or offering for sale of hearing aids, nor to any audiologist licensed under this chapter, or to an individual supervised by the audiologist in conducting fitting procedures, and who does not directly or indirectly engage in the sale or offering for sale of hearing aids.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.23.

(a) Hearing aids may be sold by catalog or direct mail provided that:

(1) The seller is licensed as a hearing aid dispenser in this state.

(2) There is no fitting, selection, or adaptation of the instrument and no advice is given with respect to fitting, selection, or adaptation of the instrument and no advice is given with respect to the taking of an ear impression for an earmold by the seller.

(3) The seller has received a statement which is signed by a physician and surgeon, audiologist, or a hearing aid dispenser, licensed by the State of California which verifies that
 Section 2538.36 and subdivision (b) of Section 2538.49 have been complied with.

(b) A copy of the statement referred to in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be retained by the seller for the period provided for in Section 2538.38.

(c) A licensed hearing aid dispenser who sells a hearing aid under this section shall not be required to comply with subdivision (b) of Section 2538.49.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.24.

Each person desiring to obtain a license to engage in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids shall make application to the board. The application shall be made upon a form and shall be made in the manner as is provided by the board and shall be accompanied by the fee provided for in Section 2538.57.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.25.

(a) The board shall prepare, approve, grade, and conduct examinations of applicants for a hearing aid dispenser license. The board may provide that the preparation and grading of the examination be conducted by a competent person or organization other than the board, provided, however, that the board shall establish the guidelines for the examination and shall approve the actual examination.

(b) Each applicant shall take and pass a written examination and a practical examination compiled at the direction of the board covering the critical tasks involved in the practice of fitting and selling hearing aids and the knowledge, skills, and abilities needed to perform those tasks
 safely and competently.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 11.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.26.

The board shall issue a license to all applicants who have satisfied this chapter, who are at least 18 years of age, who possess a high school diploma or its equivalent, who have not committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480, and who have paid the fees provided for in Section 2538.57. No license shall be issued to any person other than an individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.27.

(a) An applicant who has fulfilled the requirements of Section 2538.24 and has made application therefor, may have a temporary license issued to them upon satisfactory proof to the board that the applicant holds a hearing aid dispenser license in another state, that the licensee has not been subject to formal disciplinary action by another licensing authority, and that the applicant has been engaged in the fitting and sale of hearing aids for the two years immediately prior to application.

(b) A temporary license issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for one year from date of issuance and is not renewable. A temporary license shall automatically terminate upon issuance of a
 license prior to expiration of the one-year period.

(c) The holder of a temporary license issued pursuant to this section who fails either license examination shall be subject to and shall comply with the supervision requirements of Section 2538.28 and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 12.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.28.

(a) An applicant who has fulfilled the requirements of Section 2538.24, and has made application therefor, and who proves to the satisfaction of the board that they will be supervised and trained by a hearing aid dispenser who is approved by the board may have a trainee license issued to them. The trainee license shall entitle the trainee licensee to fit or sell hearing aids as set forth in regulations of the board. The supervising dispenser shall be responsible for any acts or omissions committed by a trainee licensee under their supervision that may constitute a violation of this chapter.

(b) The board shall adopt regulations setting forth criteria for its refusal to approve a hearing aid dispenser to supervise a trainee licensee, including procedures to appeal
 that decision.

(c) A trainee license issued pursuant to this section is effective and valid for six months from date of issue. The board may renew the trainee license for an additional period of six months. Except as provided in subdivision (d), the board shall not issue more than two renewals of a trainee license to any applicant. Notwithstanding subdivision (d), if a trainee licensee who is entitled to renew a trainee license does not renew the trainee license and applies for a new trainee license at a later time, the new trainee license shall only be issued and renewed subject to the limitations set forth in this subdivision.

(d) A new trainee license may be issued pursuant to this section if a trainee license issued pursuant to subdivision (c) has lapsed for a minimum of three years from the expiration or cancellation date of the previous trainee license. The board may issue
 only one new trainee license under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 11.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.29.

A trainee licensed under Section 2538.28 shall take the licensure examination within the first 12 months after the trainee license is issued. Failure to take the licensure examination within that time shall result in expiration of the trainee license, and it shall not be renewed unless the trainee licensee has first taken the licensure examination. The board, however, may in its discretion renew the trainee license if the licensee failed to take the licensure examination due to illness or other hardship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 454, Sec. 11.   (AB 1706)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.30.

(a) A temporary or trainee licensee shall not be the sole proprietor of, manage, or independently operate a business that engages in the fitting or sale of hearing aids.

(b) A temporary or trainee licensee shall not advertise or otherwise represent that they hold a license as a hearing aid dispenser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 12.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.31.

Practical examinations shall be held by the board at least twice a year. The time and place of any practical examination shall be fixed by the board at least 45 days prior to the date it is to be held.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.32.

Every applicant who obtains a passing score determined by the Angoff criterion-referenced method of establishing the point in each examination shall be deemed to have passed that examination. An applicant shall pass the written examination before they may take the practical examination. An applicant shall obtain a passing score on both the written and the practical examination in order to be issued a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 13.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.33.

(a) Before engaging in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids, each licensee shall notify the board in writing of the address or addresses where they are to engage, or intend to engage, in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids, and of any changes in their place of business within 30 days of engaging in that practice.
